Indiana, session 2026, SB198.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-8-17.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 17.5. (a) This section applies to a state employee
health plan that is established, entered into, amended, or renewed
after June 30, 2026.
(b) The definitions in section 17 of this chapter apply
throughout this section.
(c) A state employee health plan shall grant a protocol exception
for a prescription drug prescribed for the treatment of postpartum
depression that is not indicated by the federal Food and Drug
Administration for postpartum depression on the prescription
drug's approved labeling.
SECTION 2. IC 5-10-8-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) This section applies to a state employee health
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


plan that is established, entered into, amended, or renewed after
June 30, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "doula" means an individual who is
trained and certified by a nationally recognized institution in
providing emotional and physical support, but not medical or
midwife care, to pregnant women before, during, and after
childbirth.
(c) As used in this section, "maternal mental health" means a
mental health condition that occurs during pregnancy or during
the postpartum period. The term includes postpartum depression.
(d) As used in this section, "state employee health plan" means
the following:
(1) A self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of
this chapter.
(2) A contract for prepaid health services entered into under
section 7(c) of this chapter.
(e) A state employee health plan must provide coverage for:
(1) biomarker testing for preeclampsia that is conducted in
accordance with IC 16-41-45;
(2) doula services;
(3) mental health screenings provided under IC 25-1-9-5.5 or
section 28.5 of this chapter; and
(4) treatment for maternal mental health.
(f) The coverage required by this section may not be subject to
annual or lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance provisions that are more restrictive than the annual or
lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
provisions that apply generally under the state employee health
plan.
SECTION 3. IC 5-10-8-28.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 28.5. (a) This section applies to a state employee
health plan that is established, entered into, amended, or renewed
after June 30, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "contracting obstetric provider"
means a physician licensed under IC 25-22.5 who:
(1) specializes in the provision of obstetric services; and
(2) is contracted with a state employee health plan to provide
services under the state employee health plan.
(c) As used in this section, "maternal mental health" means a
mental health condition that occurs during pregnancy or during
the postpartum period. The term includes postpartum depression.
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


(d) As used in this section, "state employee health plan" means
the following:
(1) A self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of
this chapter.
(2) A contract for prepaid health services entered into under
section 7(c) of this chapter.
(e) A state employee health plan shall develop a maternal mental
health program designed to promote quality and cost effective
outcomes. As part of a maternal mental health program, a state
employee health plan is encouraged to:
(1) improve screening, treatment, and referral to maternal
mental health services;
(2) incentivize training opportunities for contracting obstetric
providers; and
(3) educate covered individuals about the program.
(f) The program must include coverage for at least:
(1) one (1) maternal mental health screening to be conducted
during pregnancy;
(2) one (1) additional screening to be conducted during the
first six (6) weeks of the postpartum period; and
(3) additional postpartum screenings, if determined to be
medically necessary and clinically appropriate in the
judgment of the treating provider.
(g) The program must:
(1) be developed consistently with sound clinical principles
and processes; and
(2) include quality measures to encourage screening,
diagnosis, treatment, and referral.
(h) The program guidelines and criteria must be provided to
relevant medical providers, including all contracting obstetric
providers.
SECTION 4. IC 12-15-5-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.35-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Pregnancy services provided under this
article may shall include reimbursement for doula services.
(b) The office may shall apply for any state plan amendment or
waiver necessary to implement this section.
(c) The office may shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
SECTION 5. IC 12-15-5-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) Pregnancy services provided under this
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


article must include reimbursement for biomarker testing for
preeclampsia that is conducted in accordance with IC 16-41-45.
(b) The office may apply for any state plan amendment or
waiver necessary to implement this section.
(c) The office may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this
section.
SECTION 6. IC 12-23-16-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The division may
do the following:
(1) Provide for the promotion, establishment, coordination, and
conduct of unified local programs of prevention, diagnosis,
treatment, and rehabilitation in the field of drug abuse in
cooperation with federal, state, local, and private agencies.
(2) Survey and analyze the state's needs and formulate a
comprehensive plan for the long range development of local
community treatment programs through the utilization of state,
federal, local, and private resources for the prevention and control
of drug abuse.
(3) With the approval of the budget agency, make agreements
concerning local community treatment programs, including
agreements with public and private agencies, to do or cause to be
done whatever is necessary, desirable, or proper to carry out the
purposes and objectives of this chapter within the amounts made
available by appropriation, gift, grant, devise, or bequest.
(4) Establish and operate local community rehabilitation centers
and other local facilities that the division considers necessary or
desirable for the care, treatment, and rehabilitation of drug
abusers.
(5) Approve facilities and services for the local community
treatment, care, or rehabilitation of drug abusers.
(6) With the approval of the budget agency, accept on behalf of
the state a gift, grant, devise, or bequest.
(7) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter.
(b) The division shall prioritize the development and
implementation of a program for pregnant women and children
with a substance use disorder that includes the following:
(1) Identification of the aggregate number of:
(A) pregnant women; and
(B) newborns who are born;
with a substance use disorder in Indiana.
(2) Development and implementation of intervention
strategies to eliminate substance use disorders of pregnant
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


women.
(3) Implementation of treatment for pregnant women and
children born with a substance use disorder, including
requiring substance use programs to prioritize treatment of
pregnant women and children.
(4) Continuous monitoring and treatment of women and
children who while pregnant or at birth, as applicable,
previously had a substance use disorder and the provision of
any necessary treatment and rehabilitation for these women
and children.
The division may consult with the Indiana department of health in
developing and implementing the program.
SECTION 7. IC 16-18-2-36.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 36.1. "Biomarker", for purposes
of IC 16-41-45, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-41-45-1.
SECTION 8. IC 16-18-2-36.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 36.3. "Biomarker testing", for
purposes of IC 16-41-45, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-41-45-2.
SECTION 9. IC 16-18-2-68.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 68.8. "Consensus statements", for
purposes of IC 16-41-45, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-41-45-3.
SECTION 10. IC 16-18-2-244.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 244.6. "Nationally recognized
clinical practice guidelines", for purposes of IC 16-41-45, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-41-45-4.
SECTION 11. IC 16-19-13-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The office shall develop,
maintain, and disseminate information concerning resources that
are available to pregnant women and new mothers, including the
following:
(1) Information about postpartum depression and other
related mental health disorders, including the symptoms,
treatment, and available resources.
(2) Substance use disorders and available resources.
(3) Any other available resources that the office believes a
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


pregnant woman or new mother may find useful during
pregnancy and postpartum, including existing programs that
provide assistance to the woman.
(b) The office shall make the information described in
subsection (a) available:
(1) on the state department's website; and
(2) to hospitals, birthing centers, and other health care
providers who provide care to pregnant women, new mothers,
and infants.
(c) The office may consult with the office of the secretary of
family and social services in the development of the resources
described in subsection (a).
SECTION 12. IC 16-19-13-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. The office shall provide, at no
cost to health care providers, continuing education courses
concerning postpartum depression and other related mental health
disorders, including the symptoms, treatment, and available
resources.
SECTION 13. IC 16-21-2-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. A hospital or birthing center
licensed under this article that offers birthing services shall, before
a patient's discharge from the hospital or birthing center following
birth, provide the patient with information concerning postpartum
depression and other related mental health disorders, including the
symptoms, treatment, and available resources.
SECTION 14. IC 16-41-45 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 45. Preeclampsia Biomarker Testing
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "biomarker" means a
characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an
indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or
pharmacologic responses to a specific therapeutic intervention.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) Gene mutations.
(2) Protein expression.
(3) Known gene-drug interactions for medications.
(4) Characteristics of genes.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "biomarker testing" means
the analysis of a patient's tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


the presence of a biomarker using a federal Food and Drug
Administration approved method of analysis.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) Single-analyte tests.
(2) Multiplex panel tests.
(3) Whole genome sequencing.
(4) Protein expression.
(5) Whole exome.
(6) Whole transcriptome.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "consensus statements" means
statements that are:
(1) developed by an independent, multi-disciplinary panel of
experts:
(A) utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting
structure; and
(B) with a conflict of interest policy;
(2) aimed at specific clinical circumstances; and
(3) based on the best available evidence for the purpose of
optimizing the outcomes of clinical care.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "nationally recognized clinical
practice guidelines" means evidence based clinical practice
guidelines that:
(1) are developed by independent organizations or medical
professional societies:
(A) utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting
structure; and
(B) with a conflict of interest policy;
(2) establish standards of care informed by:
(A) a systematic review of evidence; and
(B) an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative
care options; and
(3) include recommendations intended to optimize patient
care.
Sec. 5. (a) A pregnant woman may be screened for preeclampsia
using biomarker testing if the biomarker testing is ordered by the
attending physician in accordance with this chapter.
(b) Each preeclampsia biomarker testing must be conducted by
the:
(1) attending physician; or
(2) other health care provider who is providing prenatal care
for the pregnant woman;
according to nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


consensus statements.
Sec. 6. The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to implement this chapter.
SECTION 15. IC 22-2-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 21. Hoosier Family Leave Insurance Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "average weekly wage" means
the average weekly wage of a covered individual over a base period
established by the department.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "covered employer" means an
employer (as defined in IC 22-4-7) that is subject to the
unemployment compensation system under IC 22-4.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "covered individual" means:
(1) an employee of a covered employer; and
(2) any self-employed individual who elects coverage under
section 12 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "department" refers to the
department of workforce development established under
IC 22-4.1-2.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter "fund" refers to the Hoosier
family leave insurance trust fund established by section 10 of this
chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the Hoosier
family leave insurance program established by section 9 of this
chapter.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "qualified family leave" means
leave taken by a covered individual for one (1) or more of the
following reasons:
(1) The:
(A) birth of a child of the covered individual; and
(B) care of the child within twelve (12) months after birth.
(2) The:
(A) placement of a child with the covered individual for
adoption or foster care; and
(B) care of the child within twelve (12) months after
placement.
(3) To care for a child, spouse, or parent of the covered
individual who has a serious health condition.
(4) The covered individual's own serious health condition, to
the extent that the condition is not otherwise covered by an
employer sponsored short term disability plan.
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


(5) Any other purpose designated by the department by rule
that is consistent with the federal Family and Medical Leave
Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.).
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "state average weekly wage"
means the state average weekly wage as determined annually by
the department.
Sec. 9. The Hoosier family leave insurance program is
established to provide wage replacement benefits to covered
individuals during periods of qualified family leave.
Sec. 10. (a) The Hoosier family leave insurance trust fund is
established for the purpose of:
(1) depositing contributions from covered individuals; and
(2) paying benefits and administrative costs for the program.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(c) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Contributions from covered individuals made under
section 11(a) of this chapter.
(2) Voluntary contributions from covered employers made
under section 11(b) of this chapter.
(3) All interest and earnings on investments of the funds.
(d) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 11. (a) Each covered employer shall, in the manner
prescribed by the department:
(1) withhold from the wages of each covered individual an
amount equal to the contribution rate established under
subsection (c) or (d); and
(2) remit those amounts to the fund.
(b) A covered employer may elect to contribute additional
amounts to the fund on behalf of covered individuals as an
employer provided benefit.
(c) The initial contribution rate for a covered individual is
five-tenths percent (0.5%) of the lesser of:
(1) the covered individual's wages; or
(2) the Social Security wage base or another wage cap as
designated by the department.
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


(d) After obtaining an independent actuarial analysis, the
department may adjust the contribution rate not more than once
per year to ensure the actuarial soundness of the fund. The
contribution rate may be adjusted to an amount that is:
(1) at least four-tenths percent (0.4%); and
(2) not more than six-tenths percent (0.6%);
of the lesser of a wage described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2).
(e) The department shall provide public notice of any
adjustment made under subsection (d).
Sec. 12. (a) A self-employed individual may elect to participate
in the program for an initial period of not less than three (3) years.
(b) If a self-employed individual elects to participate in the
program, the individual shall remit contributions to the fund at an
amount equal to the contribution rate established under section 11
of this chapter.
Sec. 13. (a) A covered individual is eligible to receive benefits
under this chapter if the individual:
(1) has satisfied minimum earnings or contribution
requirements established by the department; and
(2) is:
(A) taking qualified family leave; and
(B) not receiving full wage replacement from the covered
employer.
(b) A covered individual may receive not more than twelve (12)
weeks of family leave insurance benefits in a benefit year for leave
that is taken not more than twelve (12) months after the qualifying
event.
(c) Weekly benefits under the program must be calculated as
sixty percent (60%) of a covered individual's average weekly wage,
subject to a maximum weekly benefit amount equal to a percentage
that is:
(1) at least fifty percent (50%); and
(2) not more than sixty percent (60%);
of the state average weekly wage as specified annually by the
department to maintain fund solvency.
(d) The department may adopt graduated or tiered benefit
formulas within the limits of subsection (c) to ensure that lower
wage workers receive proportionally greater wage replacement
while maintaining the solvency of the fund.
(e) Benefits under this chapter are in addition to any rights or
protections available under the federal Family and Medical Leave
Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.) and any employer provider
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


paid leave. However, a covered employer may coordinate or offset
benefits as provided in the covered employer's written policy and
in rules adopted by the department.
Sec. 14. (a) This chapter does not create new job protection
requirements for covered employers beyond those otherwise
required by federal or state law.
(b) A covered employer may:
(1) voluntarily provide job protection or continuation of
benefits for covered individuals who receive benefits under
this chapter; and
(2) describe the job protection or continuation of benefits
provided under subdivision (1) in an employee handbook or
written leave policy.
Sec. 15. (a) The department shall administer this chapter using,
to the greatest extent practicable, existing personnel, systems, and
infrastructure used for the unemployment compensation system or
other wage reporting programs.
(b) The department may contract with a third party
administrator or licensed insurer to perform some or all of the
administrative functions of the program if the costs to contract
with the third party administrator or licensed insurer are paid
exclusively from the fund.
(c) The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary
to implement this chapter.
(d) Any rules adopted to implement this chapter may not impose
unfunded mandates on covered employers beyond the obligation to
withhold and remit employee contributions as required by section
11(a) of this chapter.
Sec. 16. (a) The department may not commence payment of
benefits under this chapter until the department determines, based
on an independent actuarial analysis, that projected contributions
will be sufficient to pay projected benefits and administrative
expenses of the program.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create a vested
right to benefits that exceed the balance available in the fund.
SECTION 16. IC 22-4.1-4-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 276, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) The department shall do the
following:
(1) Administer the Wagner-Peyser program, the WIOA, a free
public labor exchange, and related federal and state employment
and training programs as directed by the governor.
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


(2) Formulate and implement an employment and training plan as
required by the WIOA, and the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. 49
et seq.).
(3) Coordinate activities with all state agencies and departments
that either provide employment and training related services or
operate appropriate resources or facilities, to maximize Indiana's
efforts to provide employment opportunities for economically
disadvantaged individuals, dislocated workers, and others with
substantial barriers to employment.
(4) Apply for, receive, disburse, allocate, and account for all
funds, grants, gifts, and contributions of money, property, labor,
and other things of value from public and private sources,
including grants from agencies and instrumentalities of the state
and the federal government.
(5) Enter into agreements with the United States government that
may be required as a condition of obtaining federal funds related
to activities of the department.
(6) Enter into contracts or agreements and cooperate with local
governmental units or corporations, including profit or nonprofit
corporations, or combinations of units and corporations to carry
out the duties of the department imposed by this chapter,
including contracts for the establishment and administration of
employment and training offices and the delegation of the
department's administrative, monitoring, and program
responsibilities and duties set forth in this article.
(7) Perform other services and activities that are specified in
contracts for payments or reimbursement of the costs made with
the Secretary of Labor, any federal, state, or local public agency
or administrative entity, or a private for-profit or nonprofit
organization under the WIOA.
(8) Enter into contracts or agreements and cooperate with entities
that provide career and technical education to carry out the duties
imposed by this article.
(9) Serve as the state advisory body required under the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 under 29
U.S.C. 3101 et seq., including reauthorizations of WIOA.
(b) The department shall distribute federal funds made available for
employment training in accordance with:
(1) the WIOA, and other applicable federal laws; and
(2) the plan prepared under subsection (c)(1).
(c) In addition to the duties prescribed in subsections (a) and (b), the
department shall do the following:
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


(1) Implement the postsecondary career and technical education
programming plan prepared under IC 22-4.1-19-4 (before its
repeal).
(2) Upon request of the budget director, prepare a legislative
budget request for state and federal funds for employment
training. The budget director shall determine the period to be
covered by the budget request.
(3) Make or cause to be made studies of the needs for various
types of programs that are related to employment training and
authorized under the WIOA.
(4) Distribute state funds made available for employment training
that have been appropriated by the general assembly in
accordance with the general assembly appropriation.
(5) Collect from each employer subject to IC 22-4 the following
information in the form and manner prescribed by the department:
(A) The Standard Occupational Classification code applicable
to each employee as prescribed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or primary
job title as recorded and reported by the employer.
(B) Whether each employee is:
(i) classified by the employer as full-time, part-time, intern,
or apprentice; or
(ii) designated as a seasonal worker pursuant to a decision
issued by the department.
(C) The hourly rate of pay for each employee.
(6) Enter into data sharing agreements and transmit the data
collected under subdivision (5), in addition to any other relevant
data, to agencies deemed appropriate by the department for:
(A) assessing outcomes of education and workforce programs;
(B) evaluating educational and workforce training
investments;
(C) informing labor market analysis; and
(D) conducting economic research.
(7) Minimize employer reporting burdens, where feasible,
through:
(A) aligning and streamlining definitions and requirements for
quarterly wage and employment reports;
(B) deploying user friendly application programming
interfaces; and
(C) other means to simplify reporting processes.
(8) Establish an employer outreach and communications
campaign in collaboration with statewide business and industry
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


associations to increase the number of employers that report
accurate data under subdivision (5).
(9) Administer the Hoosier family leave insurance program
under IC 22-2-21.
SECTION 17. IC 22-9-1-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2019,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The commission shall establish and
maintain a permanent office in the city of Indianapolis.
(b) Except as it concerns judicial review, the commission may adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter.
(c) The commission shall formulate policies to effectuate the
purposes of this chapter and make recommendations to agencies and
officers of the state or local subdivisions thereof to effectuate such
policies. The several departments, commissions, divisions, authorities,
boards, bureaus, agencies, and officers of the state or any political
subdivision or agency thereof shall furnish the commission, upon its
request, all records, papers, and information in their possession relating
to any matter before the commission.
(d) The commission shall receive and investigate complaints
alleging discriminatory practices. The commission shall not hold
hearings in the absence of a complaint. All investigations of complaints
shall be conducted by staff members of the civil rights commission or
their agents.
(e) The commission may create such advisory agencies and
conciliation councils, local or statewide, as will aid in effectuating the
purposes of this chapter. The commission may itself, or it may
empower these agencies and councils to:
(1) study the problems of discrimination in the areas covered by
section 2 of this chapter when based on race, religion, color, sex,
handicap, national origin, or ancestry; and
(2) foster through community effort, or otherwise, good will
among the groups and elements of the population of the state.
These agencies and councils may make recommendation to the
commission for the development of policies and procedures in general.
Advisory agencies and conciliation councils created by the commission
shall be composed of representative citizens serving without pay, but
with reimbursement for reasonable and necessary actual expenses.
(f) The commission may issue such publications and such results of
investigations and research as in its judgment will tend to promote
good will and minimize or eliminate discrimination because of race,
religion, color, sex, handicap, national origin, or ancestry.
(g) The commission shall prevent any person from discharging,
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


expelling, or otherwise discriminating against any other person because
the person filed a complaint, testified in any hearing before this
commission, or in any way assisted the commission in any matter under
its investigation.
(h) The commission may hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel
their attendance, administer oaths, take the testimony of any person
under oath, and require the production for examination of any books
and papers relating to any matter under investigation or in question
before the commission. The commission may make rules as to the
issuance of subpoenas by individual commissioners. Contumacy or
refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this section shall constitute a
contempt. All hearings shall be held within Indiana at a location
determined by the commission. A citation of contempt may be issued
upon application by the commission to the circuit or superior court in
the county in which the hearing is held or in which the witness resides
or transacts business.
(i) The commission may:
(1) before July 1, 2020, appoint administrative law judges other
than commissioners; and
(2) after June 30, 2020, request assignment of an administrative
law judge (as defined in IC 4-21.5-1-2);
when an appointment is deemed necessary by a majority of the
commission. The administrative law judges shall be members in good
standing before the bar of Indiana and shall be appointed by the
chairman of the commission. An administrative law judge appointed
under this subsection shall have the same powers and duties as a
commissioner sitting as an administrative law judge. However, the
administrative law judge may not issue subpoenas.
(j) The commission shall state its findings of fact after a hearing
and, if the commission finds a person has engaged in an unlawful
discriminatory practice, shall cause to be served on this person an order
requiring the person to cease and desist from the unlawful
discriminatory practice and requiring the person to take further
affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes of this chapter,
including but not limited to the power:
(1) to restore the complainant's losses incurred as a result of
discriminatory treatment, as the commission may deem necessary
to assure justice; however, except in discriminatory practices
involving veterans and discriminatory practices involving job
applicants or employees who are affected by pregnancy,
childbirth, or a related medical condition (as defined by
IC 22-9-12.1-6) under IC 22-9-12.1, this specific provision when
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


applied to orders pertaining to employment shall include only
wages, salary, or commissions;
(2) to require the posting of notice setting forth the public policy
of Indiana concerning civil rights and the respondent's compliance
with the policy in places of public accommodations;
(3) to require proof of compliance to be filed by the respondent at
periodic intervals; and
(4) to require a person who has been found to be in violation of
this chapter and who is licensed by a state agency authorized to
grant a license to show cause to the licensing agency why the
person's license should not be revoked or suspended.
When an employer has been found to have committed a discriminatory
practice in employment by failing to employ an applicant on the basis
that the applicant is a veteran, the order to restore the veteran's losses
may include placing the veteran in the employment position with the
employer for which the veteran applied.
(k) Judicial review of a cease and desist order or other affirmative
action as referred to in this chapter may be obtained under IC 22-9-8.
If no proceeding to obtain judicial review is instituted within thirty (30)
days from receipt of notice by a person that an order has been made by
the commission, the commission, if it determines that the person upon
whom the cease and desist order has been served is not complying or
is making no effort to comply, may obtain a decree of a court for the
enforcement of the order in circuit or superior court upon showing that
the person is subject to the commission's jurisdiction and resides or
transacts business within the county in which the petition for
enforcement is brought.
(l) If, upon all the evidence, the commission shall find that a person
has not engaged in any unlawful practice or violation of this chapter,
the commission shall state its findings of facts and shall issue and
cause to be served on the complainant an order dismissing the
complaint as to the person.
(m) The commission may furnish technical assistance requested by
persons subject to this chapter to further compliance with this chapter
or with an order issued under this chapter.
(n) The commission shall promote the creation of local civil rights
agencies to cooperate with individuals, neighborhood associations, and
state, local, and other agencies, both public and private, including
agencies of the federal government and of other states.
(o) The commission may reduce the terms of conciliation agreed to
by the parties to writing (to be called a consent agreement) that the
parties and a majority of the commissioners shall sign. When signed,
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


the consent agreement shall have the same effect as a cease and desist
order issued under subsection (j). If the commission determines that a
party to the consent agreement is not complying with it, the
commission may obtain enforcement of the consent agreement in a
circuit or superior court upon showing that the party is not complying
with the consent agreement and the party is subject to the commission's
jurisdiction and resides or transacts business within the county in
which the petition for enforcement is brought.
(p) In lieu of investigating a complaint and holding a hearing under
this section, the commission may issue an order based on findings and
determinations by the federal Department of Housing and Urban
Development or the federal Equal Employment Opportunity
Commission concerning a complaint that has been filed with one (1) of
these federal agencies and with the commission. The commission shall
adopt by rule standards under which the commission may issue such an
order.
(q) Upon notice that a complaint is the subject of an action in a
federal court, the commission shall immediately cease investigation of
the complaint and may not conduct hearings or issue findings of fact or
orders concerning that complaint.
SECTION 18. IC 22-9-1-16 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) This section
does not apply to a claim under IC 22-9-12.1.
(a) (b) A respondent or a complainant may elect to have the claims
that are the basis for a finding of probable cause decided in a civil
action as provided by section 17 of this chapter. However, both the
respondent and the complainant must agree in writing to have the
claims decided in a court of law. The agreement must be on a form
provided by the commission.
(b) (c) The election may not be made if the commission has begun
a hearing on the record under this chapter with regard to a finding of
probable cause.
SECTION 19. IC 22-9-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Pregnancy and Childbirth Accommodation).
SECTION 20. IC 22-9-12.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 12.1. Pregnancy and Childbirth Discrimination
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "commission" means the civil
rights commission created by IC 22-9-1-4.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "complaint" has the meaning set
forth in IC 22-9-1-3(o).
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "employer" has the meaning set
forth in IC 22-9-1-3(h).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "health care professional"
includes:
(1) a physician;
(2) a psychiatrist;
(3) a psychologist;
(4) a nurse;
(5) a physical therapist;
(6) an occupational therapist;
(7) a speech therapist;
(8) a vocational rehabilitation specialist;
(9) a midwife;
(10) a lactation consultant; and
(11) a licensed medical health professional.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "reasonable accommodation"
includes the following:
(1) More frequent or longer breaks.
(2) Modification of uniforms.
(3) Time off work to recover from childbirth.
(4) Acquisition or modification of equipment.
(5) Seating.
(6) Temporary transfer to a less strenuous or less hazardous
position.
(7) Job restructuring.
(8) Light duty.
(9) Work break time for expressing breast milk.
(10) Private nonbathroom space for expressing breast milk.
(11) Assistance with manual labor.
(12) Modified work schedules.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "related medical condition"
means a medical condition related to pregnancy or childbirth.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "undue hardship" has the
meaning set forth in IC 22-9-5-18(a).
Sec. 8. It is the policy of the state to prohibit discrimination
against an employee or applicant for employment due to the
employee or applicant being pregnant or having conditions related
to pregnancy, conditions related to childbirth, or related medical
conditions.
Sec. 9. (a) It is an unlawful employment practice for an
employer to discriminate against an employee or an applicant for
employment on the basis of the employee or applicant having a
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


condition related to pregnancy, condition related to childbirth, or
related medical condition.
(b) It is unlawful discrimination for an employer:
(1) to not make a reasonable accommodation for an employee
or applicant for employment related to the employee or
applicant having a:
(A) condition related to pregnancy;
(B) condition related to childbirth; or
(C) related medical condition;
if the employer knew about the condition, unless the employer
can demonstrate that the accommodation would impose an
undue hardship on the employer;
(2) to take adverse action against an employee who has
requested or used an accommodation for the employee's:
(A) condition related to pregnancy;
(B) condition related to childbirth; or
(C) related medical condition;
after the employee's need for a reasonable accommodation
ceases, including by failing to reinstate the employee to the
employee's original job or an equivalent position with
equivalent pay, accumulated seniority, retirement, fringe
benefits, and applicable service credits;
(3) to deny an employment opportunity to a qualified
employee or applicant for employment if the denial is the
result of the employer making a reasonable accommodation
for the employee's or applicant's:
(A) condition related to pregnancy;
(B) condition related to childbirth; or
(C) related medical condition;
that the employer knows of;
(4) to require an employee to accept an accommodation the
employee does not want to accept with respect to the
employee's:
(A) condition related to pregnancy;
(B) condition related to childbirth; or
(C) related medical condition;
that the employer knows of, if that accommodation is
unnecessary to enable the employee to perform the employee's
job;
(5) to require an employee to take leave if another reasonable
accommodation can be provided for the employee with
respect to the employee's:
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


(A) condition related to pregnancy;
(B) condition related to childbirth; or
(C) related medical condition;
that the employer knows of; or
(6) to fail to engage with good faith in a timely and interactive
process with an employee who the employer knows has a
condition related to pregnancy, a condition related to
childbirth, or a related medical condition, to determine
effective and reasonable accommodations.
Sec. 10. (a) An employer may request an employee to obtain
medical documentation from an appropriate health care
professional explaining the need for a reasonable accommodation
for the employee with respect to the employee's condition related
to pregnancy, condition related to childbirth, or related medical
condition if:
(1) the employee is requesting time away from work,
including for medical appointments, outside of maternity
leave and the employer requests documentation from other
employees for the other employees' time off for medical care;
or
(2) the employee is requesting to work from home, on an
intermittent basis or long term basis.
(b) If an employer believes that documentation provided under
subsection (a) is insufficient, the employer may request:
(1) that the employee obtain additional documentation; or
(2) permission from the employee to speak to the health care
professional;
before the employer approves or denies the accommodation
request.
(c) An employee may submit additional written documentation
if the employee does not want the employer to speak with the
health care professional under subsection (b).
Sec. 11. An employer is not required to:
(1) create an additional position for an employee who has a:
(A) condition related to pregnancy;
(B) condition related to childbirth; or
(C) related medical condition;
that the employer knows of, unless the employer has created
a position to accommodate another employee who is in
another class;
(2) discharge an employee in order to accommodate an
employee who the employer knows has a condition related to
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


pregnancy, a condition related to childbirth, or a related
medical condition, unless the employer has previously
discharged an employee to accommodate another employee
who is in another class; or
(3) transfer an employee in order to accommodate an
employee who the employer knows has a condition related to
pregnancy, a condition related to childbirth, or a related
medical condition, unless the employer has previously
transferred an employee to accommodate another employee
who is in another class.
Sec. 12. (a) An employer shall provide written notice to:
(1) a new employee, at the commencement of employment;
(2) an existing employee, by November 1, 2026; and
(3) an employee who notifies the employer that the employee
is pregnant, not later than ten (10) days after the employee
notifies the employer of the employee's pregnancy;
that the employee has the right to be free from discrimination
based on the employee being pregnant or having a condition
related to pregnancy, a condition related to childbirth, or a related
medical condition.
(b) Notice under this section must be conspicuously posted at the
employer's place of business in an area accessible to employees.
(c) The commission shall develop educational materials and
make public education efforts to inform employers, employees,
employment agencies, and job applicants of:
(1) employee and applicant rights; and
(2) duties of employers;
under this chapter.
Sec. 13. (a) The commission shall receive, investigate, and
attempt to resolve complaints of violations of this chapter from
complainants in the manner provided by IC 22-9-1-6.
(b) At the conclusion of an investigation, the commission shall
determine if a violation of this chapter exists.
(c) If the commission determines that a violation of this chapter
exists and the complaint has not been resolved, the complainant
may file an action for injunctive relief in a circuit or superior court
in the county where the allegations occurred.
Sec. 14. This chapter does not preempt, limit, diminish, or affect
other statutes concerning sex discrimination, pregnancy
discrimination, or childbirth discrimination.
SECTION 21. IC 25-1-9-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) A practitioner who is providing postnatal care
to a woman during the twelve (12) month period following birth
shall screen the woman for signs and symptoms of postpartum
depression or a related mental health disorder by using a screening
tool recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists if the practitioner believes, in the practitioner's
professional medical judgment, that the screening would be in the
best interest of the woman.
(b) A practitioner who is providing pediatric care to an infant
who is less than one (1) year of age shall screen the caregiver
accompanying the infant for postpartum depression or a related
mental health disorder in accordance with recommendations of the
American Academy of Pediatrics if the practitioner:
(1) receives the consent of the caregiver; and
(2) believes, in the practitioner's professional medical
judgment, that the screening would be in the best interest of
the caregiver.
A screening under this subsection does not create a
physician-patient relationship between the practitioner and the
caregiver or establish any continuing obligation to provide medical
services by the practitioner. However, if the screening of a
caregiver by the practitioner is positive for a mental health
disorder, the practitioner shall provide a referral for the
appropriate mental health services.
SECTION 22. IC 27-8-5-32 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 32. (a) This section applies to a policy of accident and
sickness insurance that is issued, entered into, amended, or
renewed after June 30, 2026.
(b) The definitions in section 30 of this chapter apply
throughout this section.
(c) An insurer shall grant a protocol exception for a prescription
drug prescribed for the treatment of postpartum depression that
is not indicated by the federal Food and Drug Administration for
postpartum depression on the prescription drug's approved
labeling.
SECTION 23. IC 27-8-24-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. As used in this chapter,
"contracting obstetric provider" means a physician licensed under
IC 25-22.5 who:
(1) specializes in the provision of obstetric services; and
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


(2) is contracted with a health insurer to provide services
under a policy or contract.
SECTION 24. IC 27-8-24-2.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.3. As used in this chapter,
"doula" means an individual who is trained and certified by a
nationally recognized institution in providing emotional and
physical support, but not medical or midwife care, to pregnant
women before, during, and after childbirth.
SECTION 25. IC 27-8-24-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. As used in this chapter,
"health insurer" means:
(1) an insurer that issues policies of accident and sickness
insurance (as defined in IC 27-8-5-1); or
(2) a health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19).
SECTION 26. IC 27-8-24-2.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.7. As used in this chapter,
"maternal mental health" means a mental health condition that
occurs during pregnancy or during the postpartum period. The
term includes postpartum depression.
SECTION 27. IC 27-8-24-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a policy of accident and sickness insurance; and
(2) an individual contract or a group contract;
that is issued, entered into, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2026.
(b) A policy of accident and sickness insurance, an individual
contract, and a group contract that provides maternity benefits
must provide coverage for:
(1) biomarker testing for preeclampsia that is conducted in
accordance with IC 16-41-45;
(2) doula services;
(3) mental health screenings provided under IC 25-1-9-5.5 or
section 7(c) of this chapter; and
(4) treatment for maternal mental health.
(c) The coverage required by this section may not be subject to
annual or lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance provisions that are more restrictive than the annual or
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
provisions that apply generally under the policy or contract.
SECTION 28. IC 27-8-24-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a policy of accident and sickness insurance; and
(2) an individual contract or a group contract;
that is issued, entered into, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2026.
(b) A health insurer shall develop a maternal mental health
program designed to promote quality and cost effective outcomes.
As part of a maternal mental health program, a health insurer is
encouraged to:
(1) improve screening, treatment, and referral to maternal
mental health services;
(2) incentivize training opportunities for contracting obstetric
providers; and
(3) educate covered individuals and enrollees about the
program.
(c) The program must include coverage for at least:
(1) one (1) maternal mental health screening to be conducted
during pregnancy;
(2) one (1) additional screening to be conducted during the
first six (6) weeks of the postpartum period; and
(3) additional postpartum screenings, if determined to be
medically necessary and clinically appropriate in the
judgment of the treating provider.
(d) The program must:
(1) be developed consistently with sound clinical principles
and processes; and
(2) include quality measures to encourage screening,
diagnosis, treatment, and referral.
(e) The program guidelines and criteria must be provided to
relevant medical providers, including all contracting obstetric
providers.
SECTION 29. IC 27-13-7-23.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23.5. (a) This section applies to an
individual contract or a group contract that is entered into,
amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
(b) The definitions in section 23 of this chapter apply
throughout this section.
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141


(c) A health maintenance organization shall grant a protocol
exception for a prescription drug prescribed for the treatment of
postpartum depression that is not indicated by the federal Food
and Drug Administration for postpartum depression on the
prescription drug's approved labeling.
2026 IN 198—LS 6662/DI 141